ko: 중성 밀도 등급: ND1000 (10 스탑); ND128 (7 스탑); ND16 (4 스탑); ND2 (1 스탑); ND256 (8 스탑); ND32 (5 스탑); ND4 (2 스탑); ND400; ND64 (6 스탑); ND8 (3 스탑); 가변 ND2–ND32; 기타
vi: Xếp hạng mật độ trung tính: ND1000 (10 stop); ND128 (7 stop); ND16 (4 stop); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stop); ND32 (5 stop); ND4 (2 stop); ND400; ND64 (6 stop); ND8 (3 stop); Biến thiên ND2–ND32; Khác
lt-LT: Neutralaus tankio įvertinimas: ND1000 (10 žingsnių); ND128 (7 žingsniai); ND16 (4 žingsniai); ND2 (1 žingsnis); ND256 (8 žingsniai); ND32 (5 žingsniai); ND4 (2 žingsniai); ND400; ND64 (6 žingsniai); ND8 (3 žingsniai); Kintamas ND2–ND32; Kita
nb: Nøytraltetthetsvurdering: ND1000 (10 stopp); ND128 (7 stopp); ND16 (4 stopp); ND2 (1 stopp); ND256 (8 stopp); ND32 (5 stopp); ND4 (2 stopp); ND400; ND64 (6 stopp); ND8 (3 stopp); Variabel ND2–ND32; Annet
pl: Ocena gęstości neutralnej: ND1000 (10 przysłon); ND128 (7 przysłon); ND16 (4 przysłony); ND2 (1 przysłona); ND256 (8 przysłon); ND32 (5 przysłon); ND4 (2 przysłony); ND400; ND64 (6 przysłon); ND8 (3 przysłony); Zmienny ND2–ND32; Inne
el: Βαθμολογία ουδέτερης πυκνότητας: ND1000 (10 στοπ); ND128 (7 στοπ); ND16 (4 στοπ); ND2 (1 στοπ); ND256 (8 στοπ); ND32 (5 στοπ); ND4 (2 στοπ); ND400; ND64 (6 στοπ); ND8 (3 στοπ); Μεταβλητό ND2–ND32; Άλλο
hu: Semleges sűrűség értékelése: ND1000 (10 lépés); ND128 (7 lépés); ND16 (4 lépés); ND2 (1 lépés); ND256 (8 lépés); ND32 (5 lépés); ND4 (2 lépés); ND400; ND64 (6 lépés); ND8 (3 lépés); Változtatható ND2–ND32; Egyéb
ja: NDフィルター濃度: ND1000（10段）; ND128（7段）; ND16（4段）; ND2（1段）; ND256（8段）; ND32（5段）; ND4（2段）; ND400; ND64（6段）; ND8（3段）; 可変式ND2-ND32; その他
fr: Indice de densité neutre: ND1000 (10 stops); ND128 (7 stops); ND16 (4 stops); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stops); ND32 (5 stops); ND4 (2 stops); ND400; ND64 (6 stops); ND8 (3 stops); Variable ND2–ND32; Autre
nl: Neutrale dichtheid classificatie: ND1000 (10 stops); ND128 (7 stops); ND16 (4 stops); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stops); ND32 (5 stops); ND4 (2 stops); ND400; ND64 (6 stops); ND8 (3 stops); Variabel ND2–ND32; Andere
cs: Hodnocení neutrální hustoty: ND1000 (10 clon); ND128 (7 clon); ND16 (4 clony); ND2 (1 clona); ND256 (8 clon); ND32 (5 clon); ND4 (2 clony); ND400; ND64 (6 clon); ND8 (3 clony); Variabilní ND2–ND32; Jiné
pt-PT: Classificação de densidade neutra: ND1000 (10 stops); ND128 (7 stops); ND16 (4 stops); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stops); ND32 (5 stops); ND4 (2 stops); ND400; ND64 (6 stops); ND8 (3 stops); ND variável ND2–ND32; Outro
pt-BR: Classificação de densidade neutra: ND1000 (10 pontos); ND128 (7 pontos); ND16 (4 pontos); ND2 (1 ponto); ND256 (8 pontos); ND32 (5 pontos); ND4 (2 pontos); ND400; ND64 (6 pontos); ND8 (3 pontos); ND2–ND32 variável; Outro
th: ระดับความหนาแน่นกลาง: ND1000 (10 สต็อป); ND128 (7 สต็อป); ND16 (4 สต็อป); ND2 (1 สต็อป); ND256 (8 สต็อป); ND32 (5 สต็อป); ND4 (2 สต็อป); ND400; ND64 (6 สต็อป); ND8 (3 สต็อป); ND แปรผัน ND2–ND32; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Grad de densitate neutră: ND1000 (10 stopuri); ND128 (7 stopuri); ND16 (4 stopuri); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stopuri); ND32 (5 stopuri); ND4 (2 stopuri); ND400; ND64 (6 stopuri); ND8 (3 stopuri); ND2–ND32 variabil; Altele
tr: Nötr yoğunluk derecesi: ND1000 (10 stop); ND128 (7 stop); ND16 (4 stop); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stop); ND32 (5 stop); ND4 (2 stop); ND400; ND64 (6 stop); ND8 (3 stop); Değişken ND2–ND32; Diğer
ru: Степень нейтральной плотности: ND1000 (10 ступеней); ND128 (7 ступеней); ND16 (4 ступени); ND2 (1 ступень); ND256 (8 ступеней); ND32 (5 ступеней); ND4 (2 ступени); ND400; ND64 (6 ступеней); ND8 (3 ступени); Переменный ND2–ND32; Другой
de: Neutraldichte-Bewertung: ND1000 (10 Blenden); ND128 (7 Blenden); ND16 (4 Blenden); ND2 (1 Blende); ND256 (8 Blenden); ND32 (5 Blenden); ND4 (2 Blenden); ND400; ND64 (6 Blenden); ND8 (3 Blenden); Variabel ND2–ND32; Sonstiges
it: Valutazione della densità neutra: ND1000 (10 stop); ND128 (7 stop); ND16 (4 stop); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stop); ND32 (5 stop); ND4 (2 stop); ND400; ND64 (6 stop); ND8 (3 stop); ND2–ND32 variabile; Altro
zh-TW: 中性密度等級: ND1000（10 級）; ND128（7 級）; ND16（4 級）; ND2（1 級）; ND256（8 級）; ND32（5 級）; ND4（2 級）; ND400; ND64（6 級）; ND8（3 級）; 可調式 ND2–ND32; 其他
bg-BG: Класификация на неутрална плътност: ND1000 (10 стопа); ND128 (7 стопа); ND16 (4 стопа); ND2 (1 стоп); ND256 (8 стопа); ND32 (5 стопа); ND4 (2 стопа); ND400; ND64 (6 стопа); ND8 (3 стопа); Променлив ND2–ND32; Други
sk-SK: Klasifikácia neutrálnej hustoty: ND1000 (10 clôn); ND128 (7 clôn); ND16 (4 clony); ND2 (1 clona); ND256 (8 clôn); ND32 (5 clôn); ND4 (2 clony); ND400; ND64 (6 clôn); ND8 (3 clony); Variabilný ND2–ND32; Iné
hr-HR: Ocjena neutralne gustoće: ND1000 (10 koraka); ND128 (7 koraka); ND16 (4 koraka); ND2 (1 korak); ND256 (8 koraka); ND32 (5 koraka); ND4 (2 koraka); ND400; ND64 (6 koraka); ND8 (3 koraka); Varijabilni ND2–ND32; Ostalo
sv: Neutraldensitetsklassificering: ND1000 (10 steg); ND128 (7 steg); ND16 (4 steg); ND2 (1 steg); ND256 (8 steg); ND32 (5 steg); ND4 (2 steg); ND400; ND64 (6 steg); ND8 (3 steg); Variabel ND2–ND32; Övrigt
sl-SI: Ocena nevtralne gostote: ND1000 (10 korakov); ND128 (7 korakov); ND16 (4 koraki); ND2 (1 korak); ND256 (8 korakov); ND32 (5 korakov); ND4 (2 koraka); ND400; ND64 (6 korakov); ND8 (3 koraki); Spremenljiv ND2–ND32; Drugo
fi: Harmaasuotimen luokitus: ND1000 (10 aukkoa); ND128 (7 aukkoa); ND16 (4 aukkoa); ND2 (1 aukko); ND256 (8 aukkoa); ND32 (5 aukkoa); ND4 (2 aukkoa); ND400; ND64 (6 aukkoa); ND8 (3 aukkoa); Säädettävä ND2–ND32; Muu
da: Neutral densitetsgrad: ND1000 (10 stop); ND128 (7 stop); ND16 (4 stop); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stop); ND32 (5 stop); ND4 (2 stop); ND400; ND64 (6 stop); ND8 (3 stop); Variabel ND2–ND32; Andet
zh-CN: 中性密度等级: ND1000（10 档）; ND128（7 档）; ND16（4 档）; ND2（1 档）; ND256（8 档）; ND32（5 档）; ND4（2 档）; ND400; ND64（6 档）; ND8（3 档）; 可变 ND2–ND32; 其他
es: Clasificación de densidad neutra: ND1000 (10 pasos); ND128 (7 pasos); ND16 (4 pasos); ND2 (1 paso); ND256 (8 pasos); ND32 (5 pasos); ND4 (2 pasos); ND400; ND64 (6 pasos); ND8 (3 pasos); ND variable ND2–ND32; Otros
en: Neutral density rating: ND1000 (10 stops); ND128 (7 stops); ND16 (4 stops); ND2 (1 stop); ND256 (8 stops); ND32 (5 stops); ND4 (2 stops); ND400; ND64 (6 stops); ND8 (3 stops); Variable ND2–ND32; Other